Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201844-772
Substance abuse treatment center, defined.

Substance abuse treatment center shall mean an institution licensed as a substance abuse treatment center by the Department of Health and Human Services, which provides a program for the inpatient or outpatient treatment of alcoholism pursuant to a written treatment plan approved and monitored by a physician and which is affiliated with a hospital under a contractual agreement with an established system for patient referral.

Laws 1980, LB 646, § 4;

Laws 1985, LB 209, § 1;

Laws 1985, LB 253, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 237;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 17;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 70;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 174;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 47.
July 19, 2018